Louisiana, session 2026, SB221.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1132 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1132. Ambulance provider treatment-in-place services; medical assistance
program
A. As used in this Section, the following definitions apply unless
otherwise indicated:
(1) "911 call" means a communication made on behalf of a beneficiary
indicating that the beneficiary may need emergency medical services.
(2) "Ambulance provider" means an ambulance provider as defined in
R.S. 40:1131. For purposes of this Section, "ambulance provider" does not
include an air ambulance provider.
(3) "Beneficiary" means a person who is entitled to receive covered
healthcare services under the terms of the medical assistance program.
(4) "Medical assistance program" means the medical assistance program
provided for in Title XIX of the Social Security Act as administered by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
(5) "Qualified medical practitioner" means a licensed physician, nurse
practitioner, or physician's assistant.
(6) "Treatment-in-place service" means an encounter between an
ambulance provider and beneficiary which takes place in response to a 911 call
where an assessment or treatment is provided by the ambulance provider to the
beneficiary but transport of the beneficiary is not performed.
B. Treatment-in-place services, as provided for by this Section, shall be
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 221 ENROLLED
a covered service under the medical assistance program.
C. Initiation and facilitation of treatment-in-place services may be
performed by ambulance providers on site to beneficiaries, with no transport,
and may include the use of audio and video telecommunication systems that
permit real-time communication between the ambulance provider and a
qualified medical practitioner. However, audio and video telecommunications
between the ambulance provider and a qualified medical practitioner shall not
be required in order for the ambulance provider to be reimbursed for
treatment-in-place services by the medical assistance program.
D. Treatment-in-place services shall only be provided in accordance with
the ambulance provider's medical direction and established protocols. Any
medical assessment or services rendered by EMS practitioners shall be
consistent with the practitioner's scope of practice.
E. All treatment-in-place services provided by ambulance providers
during the initiation and facilitation of the treatment-in-place encounter shall
be covered at the associated basic life support, emergency base rate, or the
advanced life support, Level 1 emergency base rate provided for in the
Medicaid fee schedule, depending on level of response and services rendered.
F. The Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate rules and
regulations as necessary for the implementation of the provisions of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.